Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.3551

Music Matters license plates.

"Music Matters license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the "Music Matters" logo.

[ 2011 c 229 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 229: See note following RCW 46.18.200.